dictionaries/dz_BT/dz_BT.aff
SET UTF-8
LANGCODE bo

# ignoring Ux0F35 and Ux0F37, as they are extremely rare but valid.
# This means that a syllable containing these signs at invalid places will not
# be detected by the spell checker, but this makes the code more simple at
# almost no cost
IGNORE ༵༷

NOSPLITSUGS

# The "N" makes the suffixes mandatory. It is used only with B, example: དཀ/NB,
# in this case, དཀ is invalid, but is not if there is a suffix.
NEEDAFFIX N

# grammatical suffixes only
SFX C Y 8
SFX C 0 འི . +'brel_sgra
SFX C 0 འོ . +slar_bsdu
SFX C 0 འིའོ . +'brel_sgra_slar_bsdu
SFX C 0 ར . +la_don
SFX C 0 ས . +byed_sgra
SFX C 0 འང . +rgyan_sdud
SFX C 0 འམ . +'byed_sdud
SFX C 0 /D .

# Words with mandatory vowel or suffix
# If no ashung and no vowel, a suffix is mandatory
SFX B Y 14
SFX B 0 ི/S . +i
SFX B 0 ུ/S . +u
SFX B 0 ེ/S . +e
SFX B 0 ོ/S . +o
SFX B 0 ི/D . +i
SFX B 0 ུ/D . +u
SFX B 0 ེ/D . +e
SFX B 0 ོ/D . +o
SFX B 0 འ . +ashung
SFX B 0 འབོ . +ashung+bo
SFX B 0 འཝ . +ashung+b
SFX B 0 འམ . +ashung+m
SFX B 0 འམོ . +ashung+mo
SFX B 0 /NS .

# Non-mandatory vowel or suffix. In these cases, no ashung is possible, see
# the documentation.
SFX A Y 10
SFX A 0 ི/S . +i
SFX A 0 ུ/S . +u
SFX A 0 ེ/S . +e
SFX A 0 ོ/S . +o
SFX A 0 ི/D . +i
SFX A 0 ུ/D . +u
SFX A 0 ེ/D . +e
SFX A 0 ོ/D . +o
SFX A 0 /S .
SFX A 0 /D .

# affixed particles after suffixes, all versions
SFX D Y 8
SFX D 0 ཝ . +b
SFX D 0 བོ . +bo
SFX D 0 པ . +p
SFX D 0 པོ . +po
SFX D 0 མ . +m
SFX D 0 མོ . +mo
SFX D 0 ན . +n
SFX D 0 ནི . +ni

# List of suffixes used by both A and B
SFX S Y 103
SFX S 0 ག . +g
SFX S 0 གས . +gs
SFX S 0 ང . +ng
SFX S 0 ངས . +ngs
SFX S 0 ད . +d
SFX S 0 ན . +n
SFX S 0 བ . +b
SFX S 0 བས . +bs
SFX S 0 མ . +m
SFX S 0 མས . +ms
SFX S 0 འི . +'brel_sgra
SFX S 0 འོ . +slar_bsdu
SFX S 0 འིའོ . +'brel_sgra_slar_bsdu
SFX S 0 འང . +rgyan_sdud
SFX S 0 འམ . +'byed_sdud
SFX S 0 ར . +r
SFX S 0 ལ . +l
SFX S 0 ས . +s
SFX S 0 གཔ . +g+p
SFX S 0 གཔོ . +g+po
SFX S 0 གམ . +g+m
SFX S 0 གམོ . +g+mo
SFX S 0 གན . +g+n
SFX S 0 གནི . +g+ni
SFX S 0 གསཝ . +gs+b
SFX S 0 གསཔ . +gs+p
SFX S 0 གསཔོ . +gs+po
SFX S 0 གསམ . +gs+m
SFX S 0 གསམོ . +gs+mo
SFX S 0 གསན . +gs+n
SFX S 0 གསནི . +gs+ni
SFX S 0 ངཝ . +ng+b
SFX S 0 ངབོ . +ng+bo
SFX S 0 ངཔ . +ng+p
SFX S 0 ངཔོ . +ng+po
SFX S 0 ངམ . +ng+m
SFX S 0 ངམོ . +ng+mo
SFX S 0 ངན . +ng+n
SFX S 0 ངནི . +ng+ni
SFX S 0 ངསཝ . +ngs+b
SFX S 0 ངསཔ . +ngs+p
SFX S 0 ངསཔོ . +ngs+po
SFX S 0 ངསམ . +ngs+m
SFX S 0 ངསམོ . +ngs+mo
SFX S 0 ངསན . +ngs+n
SFX S 0 ངསནི . +ngs
SFX S 0 དཝ . +d+b
SFX S 0 དཔ . +d+p
SFX S 0 དཔོ . +d+po
SFX S 0 དམ . +d+m
SFX S 0 དམོ . +d+mo
SFX S 0 དན . +d+n
SFX S 0 དནི . +d+ni
SFX S 0 ནཔ . +n+p
SFX S 0 ནཔོ . +n+po
SFX S 0 ནམ . +n+m
SFX S 0 ནམོ . +n+mo
SFX S 0 ནན . +n+n
SFX S 0 ནནི . +n+ni
SFX S 0 བཔ . +b+p
SFX S 0 བམ . +b+m
SFX S 0 བམོ . +b+mo
SFX S 0 བན . +b+n
SFX S 0 བནི . +b+ni
SFX S 0 བསཝ . +bs+b
SFX S 0 བསཔ . +bs+p
SFX S 0 བསཔོ . +bs+po
SFX S 0 བསམ . +bs+m
SFX S 0 བསམོ . +bs+mo
SFX S 0 བསན . +bs+n
SFX S 0 བསནི . +bs+ni
SFX S 0 མཔ . +m+p
SFX S 0 མཔོ . +m+po
SFX S 0 མན . +m+n
SFX S 0 མནི . +m+ni
SFX S 0 མསཝ . +ms+b
SFX S 0 མསཔ . +ms+p
SFX S 0 མསཔོ . +ms+po
SFX S 0 མསམ . +ms+m
SFX S 0 མསམོ . +ms+mo
SFX S 0 མསན . +ms+n
SFX S 0 མསནི . +ms+ni
SFX S 0 རཝ . +r+b
SFX S 0 རཔ . +r+p
SFX S 0 རཔོ . +r+po
SFX S 0 རམ . +r+m
SFX S 0 རམོ . +r+mo
SFX S 0 རན . +r+n
SFX S 0 རནི . +r+ni
SFX S 0 ལཝ . +l+b
SFX S 0 ལཔ . +l+p
SFX S 0 ལཔོ . +l+po
SFX S 0 ལམ . +l+m
SFX S 0 ལམོ . +l+mo
SFX S 0 ལན . +l+n
SFX S 0 ལནི . +l+ni
SFX S 0 སཝ . +s+b
SFX S 0 སཔ . +s+p
SFX S 0 སཔོ . +s+po
SFX S 0 སམ . +s+m
SFX S 0 སམོ . +s+mo
SFX S 0 སན . +s+n
SFX S 0 སནི . +s+ni

# Replace archaic forms by modern ones
REP 6
REP འིས ས
REP འའིས ས
REP འར ར
REP ནད ན
REP རད ར
REP ལད ལ
